Mississippi statutes. Title 17. Local Government; Provisions Common to Counties and Municipalities
Mississippi Regional Solid Waste Management Authority Act
§ 17-17-319.
Promulgation of rules and regulations relating to construction, operation and maintenance of facility owned or operated by authority; requirement of flow of municipal solid waste to particular designated facilities; disposal of waste at previously established projects.

The authority may adopt and promulgate all reasonable rules and regulations regarding the specifications and standards relating to the construction, operation and maintenance of any facility owned or operated by the authority to comply with all federal and state environmental laws and regulations.

The authority may determine if the mandatory flow of municipal solid waste to its facility is necessary to ensure the viability of the facility. Prior to the adoption of any ordinance declaring the necessity of requiring mandatory flow of municipal solid waste, the authority shall demonstrate in writing that it has considered the utilization of any municipal solid waste management facility in existence on April 12, 1991, which meets the proposed or final state and federal regulations. The authority must show that its decision not to use the existing facility is based on the fact that such facility is environmentally unsound, costs for use of such facility is inconsistent with comparable facilities within the State of Mississippi, or the use of such facility is not consistent with the local nonhazardous solid waste management plan. If the authority adopts a resolution declaring the necessity of requiring mandatory flow of municipal solid waste to the facilities by any person located or residing within the territorial boundaries of a member of the authority or a public agency or person which contracts for use or services of the facilities owned or operated by the authority, then each member shall comply by adopting a resolution or ordinance to require such mandatory flow.

All such rules and regulations prescribed by the authority shall not conflict with or suspend any rules or regulations prescribed by general statute or the Department of Environmental Quality.

Any county or municipality participating in a regional authority is authorized to require by ordinance that all municipal solid waste generated within the designated geographic area that is placed in the waste stream be collected, transported, stored and managed at a designated permitted municipal solid waste management facility or facilities serving such area. The ordinance shall not be construed to prohibit the source separation of materials for purposes of recycling from municipal solid waste prior to collection of such municipal solid waste for management, or prohibit collectors of municipal solid waste from recycling materials or limit access to such materials as an incident to collection of such municipal solid waste; provided such prohibitions do not authorize the construction and operation of a resource recovery facility unless specifically provided for pursuant to an approved local nonhazardous solid waste management plan.

Prior to April 12, 1991, any county or municipality which has issued bonds for a project as defined in Section 17-17-103, Mississippi Code of 1972, and is not a member of a regional authority may continue and is empowered to assign collection territories, to regulate the collection of municipal solid wastes and to require the disposal of municipal solid wastes at a project to provide the volume of municipal solid wastes necessary to pay the operating costs of a project, or the principal and interest on revenue bonds issued for such project, or both such operating costs and bonds. When such county or municipality becomes a member of a regional authority, the county or municipality may exercise only those mandatory flow powers consistent with the regional authority plan.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1991, ch. 581, § 10, eff from and after passage (approved April 12, 1991).

§ 17-17-321.
Contracts between public agencies and authority for provision of solid waste management services by authority; payments for services and contributions by public agencies.

Any public agency may, pursuant to a duly adopted resolution, contract with the authority for the authority to acquire, construct or provide facilities and projects to be owned by the authority for furnishing municipal solid waste management services to the public agency or to users within the boundaries of the public agency. The public agency shall be obligated to make payments which shall be sufficient to enable the authority to meet its expenses, interest and principal payments (whether at maturity or upon sinking funds redemption) for its bonds, reserves for debt service, payments into funds for operation and maintenance and renewals and replacements and the requirements of any rate covenant with respect to debt service coverage contained in any resolution, trust indenture or other security agreement relating to its bonds. Such contracts may also contain other terms and conditions as the authority and the public agency may determine, including provisions whereby the public agency is obligated to make payments under such contract whether or not use or services are rendered or whether or not the facilities are completed, operable or operating, and notwithstanding suspension, interruption, interference, reduction or curtailment of the use or services of such facilities. Such contracts may be for a term covering the life of the facilities or for any other term or for an indefinite period and may be made with or without consideration and may provide that the amounts payable by the public agency are in lieu of all or any part of the rates, fees and other charges which would otherwise be collected from the users of the facilities.

Contracts may provide that the obligation of a public agency to make payments to the authority for facilities is several, or is joint and several, with the obligations of other public agencies or other persons contracting with the authority for the use of services of such management facilities. When the public agency’s obligation is joint and several, and if any other public agency or other person defaults in his obligation, then the public agency may be required to increase its payments to the authority by a proportional amount, taking into consideration the remaining persons who are likewise contracting with the authority and who are not in default.

The obligations of a public agency arising under the terms of any contract referred to in this section, whether or not payable solely from revenues or solely from a pledge of ad valorem taxes or any combination thereof, shall not be construed as being included within the indebtedness limitations of the public agency for purposes of any constitutional or statutory limitation or provision. To the extent provided in such contract and to the extent such obligations of the public agency are payable solely from the revenues and other monies derived by the public agency from the operation of its facilities which are the subject of such contract, such obligations may be treated as expenses of operating such facilities.

Contracts may also provide for payments in the form of contributions to defray the cost of any purpose set forth in the contracts and as advances for any facilities subject to repayment by the authority. A public agency may make such contributions or advances from its general fund, general obligation bond proceeds, or surplus fund or from any monies legally available therefor.

Subject to the terms of a contract referred to in this section, the authority is hereby authorized to do and perform any and all acts or things necessary, convenient or desirable to carry out the purposes of such contract, including the fixing, charging, collecting, maintaining and revising of rates, fees and other charges for the services rendered to any user of the facilities operated or maintained by the authority, whether or not such facilities are owned by the authority.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1991, ch. 581, § 11, eff from and after passage (approved April 12, 1991).

§ 17-17-323.
Rates and fees charged by public agencies for services provided by authority.

Whenever a public agency enters into a contract as authorized by Sections 17-17-301 through 17-17-349, and the payments are to be made either wholly or partly from the revenues of the authority’s facilities, the duty is hereby imposed on the public agency at the direction of the authority to fix, establish and maintain, and from time to time adjust, the rates or fees charged by the public agency for the service of such facilities to the end that the revenues from such facilities, together with any ad valorem taxes levied for such payments, will be sufficient at all times to pay: (a) the expense of operating and maintaining such facilities; (b) all of the public agency’s obligations to the authority under such contract; and (c) all of the obligations under and in connection with any outstanding bonds issued to finance in whole or in part such facilities.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1991, ch. 581, § 12, eff from and after passage (approved April 12, 1991).

§ 17-17-325.
Submission of local nonhazardous solid waste management plan by authority; designation of geographic area for collection, storage, processing and disposal of solid waste; approval of permit application for facility.

The authority may at the direction of the governing bodies of the participating units of local government submit a local nonhazardous solid waste management plan as required by Sections 17-17-201 through 17-17-235, to the Commission on Environmental Quality providing the authority’s assurance of capacity for the management of municipal solid waste within the geographical boundaries of the authority for the period of not less than twenty (20) years.

The authority may designate a geographic area to the permit board within which the collection, transportation, storage, processing and disposal of all municipal solid waste generated within such area shall be accomplished in accordance with a local nonhazardous solid waste management plan. Such designation shall be made only after the permit board has received a resolution adopted by the unit or units of local government having jurisdiction within such geographic area that such designation be made and after approval of the commission of a local nonhazardous solid waste management plan.

The permit board shall not approve any permit application unless the facility is consistent with the applicable local nonhazardous solid waste management plan.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1991, ch. 581, § 13, eff from and after passage (approved April 12, 1991).

§ 17-17-327.
Bonds of authority.

The authority is empowered and authorized, from time to time, to issue bonds in such principal amounts as shall be necessary to provide sufficient funds for achieving any of its corporate purposes, including, without limiting the generality of the foregoing, the financing of the acquisition, construction, improvement, or the closure, corrective action or post-closure maintenance of facilities, or any combination thereof, the payment of interest on bonds of the authority, establishment of reserves to secure such bonds, expenses incident to the issuance of such bonds including bond insurance and to the implementation of the authority’s programs, and all other capital expenditures but not operating costs of the authority incident to or necessary or convenient to carry out its corporate purposes and powers.

The authority may issue such types of bonds as it may determine, subject only to any agreement with the holders of particular bonds, including bonds as to which the principal and interest are payable exclusively from all or a portion of the revenues derived from one or more facilities pursuant to the contracts entered into by public agencies, and other persons pursuant to Sections 17-17-301 through 17-17-349, or any combination of any of the foregoing, or which may be secured by a pledge or any grant, subsidy, or contribution from any public agency or other person, or a pledge of an income or revenues, funds or monies of the authority from any source whatsoever.

Bonds shall be authorized by a resolution or resolutions of the authority. Such bonds shall bear such date or dates, mature at such time or times (either serially, term or a combination thereof), bear interest at such rate or rates, be in such denomination or denominations, be in such registered form, carry such conversion or registration privileges, have such rank or priority, be executed in such manner and by such officers, be payable from such sources in such medium of payment at such place or places within or without the state, provided that one (1) such place shall be within the state, be subject to such terms of redemption prior to maturity, all as may be provided by resolution or resolutions of the authority.

Any bonds of the authority may be sold at such price or prices, at public or private sale, in such manner and at such times as may be determined by the authority to be in the public interest, and the authority may pay all expenses, premiums, fees and commissions which it may deem necessary and advantageous in connection with the issuance and sale thereof.

Any pledge of earnings, revenues or other monies made by the authority shall be valid and binding from the time the pledge is made and the earnings, revenues or other monies so pledged and thereafter received by the authority shall immediately be subject to the lien of such pledge without any physical delivery thereof or further act. The lien of any such pledge shall be valid and binding as against all parties having claims of any kind in tort, contract or otherwise against the authority irrespective of whether such parties have notice thereof. Neither the resolution nor any other instrument by which a pledge is created need be recorded.

Neither the commissioners of the authority nor any person executing the bonds shall be personally liable on the bonds or be subject to any personal liability or accountability by reason of the issuance thereof.

Whenever any bonds shall have been signed by the officers designated by resolution of the authority to sign the bonds who were in office at the time of such signing but who may have ceased to be such officers prior to the sale and delivery of such bonds, or who may not have been in office on the date such bonds may bear, the manual or facsimile signatures of such officers upon such bonds and the coupons appertaining thereto, shall nevertheless be valid and sufficient for all purposes and have the same effect as if the person so officially executing such bonds had remained in office until the delivery of the same to the purchaser or had been in office on the date such bonds may bear.

Whenever a regional authority issues bonds secured by the revenues received from the participating member units of local governments, any local governmental unit which contracts for solid waste management services from the authority is hereby authorized and empowered to agree in writing with the authority that, as provided in this section, the State Tax Commission shall (a) withhold all or any part as agreed by the local governmental units of any monies which such local governmental unit is entitled to receive from time to time pursuant to any law and which is in the possession of the State Tax Commission, and (b) pay the same over to the regional authority to satisfy any delinquent payments on any services to such local governmental unit which the regional authority has determined to be necessary to ensure the timely payment of any bonds of the regional authority secured by revenue to be received from the unit of local government or as may be necessary to replenish any funds of a debt service reserve fund of the regional authority which might have been expended to pay debt service as a result of the delinquency of a unit of local government. If the regional authority shall file a copy of such written agreement, together with a statement of delinquency, with the State Tax Commission, then the State Tax Commission shall immediately make the withholdings provided in such agreement from the amounts due the local governmental unit and shall continue to pay the same over to the regional authority until all such delinquencies are satisfied.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1991, ch. 581, § 14; Laws, 1992, ch. 583 § 7, eff from and after passage (approved May 15, 1992).

§ 17-17-329.
Issuance by counties of general obligation bonds for solid waste management facilities.

The board of supervisors of a county and the governing authorities of a municipality, acting jointly or severally, shall have the power and is hereby authorized, from time to time, to issue general obligation bonds of the county or municipality for the purpose of providing sufficient funds for capital expenditures, including the financing of the acquisition, construction, improvement or the closure, corrective action or postclosure maintenance of solid waste management facilities pursuant to the provisions of Sections 19-9-1 through 19-9-25, or 21-33-301 through 21-33-329. General obligation bonds issued pursuant to this section shall be included in the limitation of indebtedness as set forth in Sections 19-9-5 and 21-33-303.

In addition to compliance with the provisions of Sections 19-9-1 through 19-9-25, Sections 21-33-301 through 21-33-329, for the issuance of general obligations of the county or municipality, the county or municipality shall advertise its intention to issue general obligation bonds of the county or municipality and specify the proposed increased tax rate of the county or municipality in a newspaper of general circulation in the county or municipality. The advertisement shall be no less than one-fourth (1/4) page in size and the type used shall be no smaller than eighteen (18) point and surrounded by a one-fourth (1/4) inch solid black border. The advertisement may not be placed in that portion of the newspaper where legal notices and classified advertisements appear. It is legislative intent that, whenever possible, the advertisement appear in a newspaper that is published at least five (5) days a week, unless the only newspaper in the county or municipality is published less than five (5) days a week. It is further the intent of the Legislature that the newspaper selected be one of general interest and readership in the community, and not one of limited subject matter. The advertisement shall be run once each week for the two (2) weeks preceding the date specified in the resolution by the board of supervisors or the governing authorities of the municipality. The advertisement shall state that the county or municipality proposes to issue general obligation bonds of the county or municipality for a solid waste management facility, the proposed property tax revenue and the procedure that may be taken by qualified electors of the county for calling an election on the question of issuance of the general obligation bonds of the county or municipality.

The form and content of the notice shall be as follows:

“NOTICE OF TAX INCREASE

(Name of the County or Municipality) has proposed to increase its property tax revenue (designate one or more classes of property provided for in Section 112, Mississippi Constitution of 1890) by (percentage of increase of each class) percent, and to increase its total budget by (percentage of increase) percent for the purpose of the issuance of general obligation bonds of the county or municipality for a solid waste management facility.”

If twenty percent (20%) or fifteen hundred (1500), whichever is less, of the qualified voters of the county or municipality file a written protest against the issuance of such bonds on or before the date specified in the resolution of the board of supervisors or governing authorities of the municipality, then an election on the question of the issuance of the bonds shall be called pursuant to Sections 19-9-13 and 19-9-15, or 21-33-307 through 21-33-311. If no protest is filed, then the bonds may be issued without an election, at any time, within two (2) years after the date specified in the resolution of the board of supervisors or governing authorities of the municipality.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1991, ch. 581, § 15; Laws, 1992, ch. 442, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 1992.

§ 17-17-331.
Temporary borrowing by authority.

Pending the issuance of revenue bonds by the authority, the authority is hereby authorized to make temporary borrowings not to exceed two (2) years in anticipation of the issue of bonds in order to provide funds in such amounts as may, from time to time, be deemed advisable prior to the issue of bonds. To provide for such temporary borrowings, the authority may enter into any purchase, loan or credit agreement, or agreements or other agreement or agreements with any banks or trust companies or other lending institutions, investment banking firms or persons in the United States having power to enter into the same. The agreements may contain such provisions not inconsistent with Sections 17-17-301 through 17-17-349 as may be authorized by the board.

All temporary borrowings made under this section shall be evidenced by notes of the authority which shall be issued, from time to time, for such amounts, in such form and in such denominations and subject to terms and conditions of sale and issue, prepayment or redemption and maturity, rate or rates of interest and time of payment of interest as the board shall authorize and direct and in accordance with Sections 17-17-301 through 17-17-349. Such authorization and direction may provide for the subsequent issuance of replacement notes to refund, upon issuance thereof, such notes, and may specify such other terms and conditions with respect to the notes and replacement notes thereby authorized for issuance as the board may determine and direct.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1991, ch. 581, § 16, eff from and after passage (approved April 12, 1991).

§ 17-17-333.
Refunding bonds of authority.

The authority may issue refunding bonds for the purpose of paying any of its bonds at or prior to maturity or upon acceleration or redemption. Refunding bonds may be issued at such time prior to the maturity or redemption of the refunded bonds as the authority deems to be in the public interest. The refunding bonds may be issued in sufficient amounts to pay or provide the principal of the bonds being refunded, together with any redemption premium thereof, any interest accrued or to accrue to the date of payment of such bonds, the expenses of issue of the refunding bonds, the expenses of redeeming the bonds being refunded, and such reserves for debt service or other capital or current expenses from the proceeds of such refunding bonds as may be required by the resolution, trust indenture or other security instruments. The issue of refunding bonds, the maturities and other details thereof, the security therefor, the rights of the holders and the rights, duties and obligations of the authority shall be governed by Sections 17-17-327 and 17-17-329 relating to the issue of bonds other than refunding bonds insofar as the same may be applicable.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1991, ch. 581, § 17, eff from and after passage (approved April 12, 1991).

§ 17-17-335.
Issuance by municipalities or counties of bonds for payment of costs for closure, post-closure maintenance or corrective action for solid waste management facilities.

The governing body of any municipality or county which owns and operates a municipal solid waste management facility which as a result of Subtitle D regulation of the Resource Conservation and Recovery Act of 1976, as amended, is required to incur cost for the closure, post-closure maintenance or any corrective action of any existing facility is authorized to issue general obligation bonds of the county or municipality pursuant to Sections 19-9-1 through 19-9-25 or Sections 21-33-301 through 21-33-323 or revenue bonds for such purposes. The revenue bonds may be payable from and serviced by any revenues derived from any fees, charges or rates for the operation of or providing for municipal solid waste collection and disposal services. The general obligation bonds shall be applied against any limitation on bonded indebtedness of the issuer.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1991, ch. 581, § 18, eff from and after passage (approved April 12, 1991).

§ 17-17-337.
Validation of bonds.

All bonds issued pursuant to Sections 17-17-329, 17-17-333 and 17-17-335 may be validated as now provided by law in Sections 31-13-1 through 31-13-11, Mississippi Code of 1972. Such validation proceedings shall be instituted in the chancery court of the county in which the principal office of the authority is located, but notice of such validation proceedings shall be published at least two (2) times in a newspaper of general circulation in each of the counties, the first publication of which in each case shall be made at least ten (10) days preceding the date set for validation.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1991, ch. 581, § 19, eff from and after passage (approved April 12, 1991).

§ 17-17-339.
Terms and conditions of bonds of authority generally.

The authority shall have power in the issuance of its bonds to:

Covenant as to the use of any or all of its property, real or personal.

Redeem the bonds, to covenant for their redemption and to provide the terms and conditions thereof.

Covenant to charge rates, fees and charges sufficient to meet operating and maintenance expenses, renewals and replacements, principal and debt service on bonds, creation and maintenance of any reserves required by a bond resolution, trust indenture or other security instrument and to provide for any margins or coverages over and above debt service on the bonds deemed desirable for the marketability of the bonds.

Covenant and prescribe as to events of default and terms and conditions upon which any or all of its bonds shall become or may be declared due before maturity, as to the terms and conditions upon which such declaration and its consequences may be waived and as to the consequences of default and the remedies of bondholders.

Covenant as to the mortgage or pledge of or the grant of a security interest in any real or personal property and all or any part of the revenues from any facilities or any revenue-producing contract or contracts made by the authority with any person to secure the payment of bonds, subject to such agreements with the holders of bonds as may then exist.

Covenant as to the custody, collection, securing, investment and payment of any revenues, assets, monies, funds or property with respect to which the authority may have any rights or interest.

Covenant as to the purposes to which the proceeds from the sale of any bonds then or thereafter to be issued may be applied, and the pledge of such proceeds to secure the payment of the bonds.

Covenant as to the limitations on the issuance of any additional bonds, the terms upon which additional bonds may be issued and secured, and the refunding of outstanding bonds.

Covenant as to the rank or priority of any bonds with respect to any lien or security.

Covenant as to the procedure by which the terms of any contract with or for the benefit of the holders of bonds may be amended or abrogated, the amount of bonds the holders of which must consent thereto, and the manner in which such consent may be given.

Covenant as to the custody of any of its properties or investments, the safekeeping thereof, the insurance to be carried thereon, and the use and disposition of insurance proceeds.

Covenant as to the vesting in a trustee or trustees, with in or outside the state, of such properties, rights, powers and duties in trust as the authority may determine.

Covenant as to the appointing and providing for the duties and obligations of a paying agent or paying agents or other fiduciaries within or outside the state.

Make all other covenants and to do any and all such acts and things as may be necessary or convenient or desirable in order to secure its bonds, or in the absolute discretion of the authority tend to make the bonds more marketable, notwithstanding that such covenants, acts or things may not be enumerated herein; it being the intention hereof to give the authority power to do all things in the issuance of bonds and in the provisions for security thereof which are not inconsistent with the Constitution of the state.

Execute all instruments necessary or convenient in the exercise of the powers herein granted or in the performance of covenants or duties, which may contain such covenants and provisions, as any purchaser of the bonds of the authority may reasonably require.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1991, ch. 581, § 20, eff from and after passage (approved April 12, 1991).

§ 17-17-341.
Appointment of trustee or receiver for enforcement or protection of rights of bondholders.

The authority may, in any authorizing resolution of the board of commissioners, trust indenture or other security instrument relating to its bonds, provide for the appointment of a trustee who shall have such powers as are provided therein to represent the bondholders of any issue of bonds in the enforcement or protection of their rights under any such resolution, trust indenture or security instrument. The authority may also provide in such resolution, trust indenture or other security instrument that the trustee, or if the trustee so appointed fails or declines to protect and enforce such bondholders’ rights then the percentage of bondholders as shall be set forth in, and subject to the provisions of, such resolution, trust indenture or other security instrument, may petition the chancery court of proper jurisdiction for the appointment of a receiver of the facilities, the revenues of which are pledged to the payment of the principal of and interest on the bonds held by such bondholders. Such receiver may exercise any power as may be granted in any such resolution, trust indenture or security instrument to enter upon and take possession of, acquire, construct or reconstruct, or operate and maintain such facilities, fix, charge, collect, enforce and receive all revenues derived from such facilities and perform the public duties and carry out the contracts and obligations of the authority in the same manner as the authority itself might do, all under the direction of such chancery court.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1991, ch. 581, § 21, eff from and after passage (approved April 12, 1991).

§ 17-17-343.
Exemption from taxation.

The exercise of the powers granted by Sections 17-17-301 through 17-17-349 will be in all respects for the benefit of the people of the state, for their well-being and prosperity and for the improvement of their social and economic conditions, and the authority shall not be required to pay any tax or assessment on any property owned by the authority or upon the income therefrom.

Any bonds issued by the authority under the provisions of Sections 17-17-301 through 17-17-349, their transfer and the income therefrom shall at all time be free from taxation by the state or any unit of local government or other instrumentality of the state, except for inheritance and gift taxes.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1991, ch. 581, § 22, eff from and after passage (approved April 12, 1991).

§ 17-17-345.
Powers of counties, municipalities or other political subdivisions and agencies and instrumentalities thereof as to assistance and cooperation with authorities.

For the purpose of attaining the objectives of Sections 17-17-301 through 17-17-349, any county, municipality or other unit of local government, public corporation, agency or instrumentality of the state, a county or municipality may, upon such terms and with or without consideration, as it may determine, do any or all of the following:

Lend, contribute, or donate money to any authority or perform services for the benefit thereof;

Donate, sell, convey, transfer, lease or grant to any authority, without the necessity of authorization at any election of qualified voters, any property of any kind; and

Do any and all things, whether or not specifically authorized in this section, not otherwise prohibited by law, that are necessary or convenient to aid and cooperate with any authority in attaining the objectives of Sections 17-17-301 through 17-17-349.

Any county, municipality or other political subdivision, public corporation, agency or instrumentality of the state, a county or municipality are each hereby specifically authorized to enter into a contract or contracts obligating any such entity to manage its solid waste, or any part thereof, at a facility or facilities owned or operated by such authority and obligating such county, municipality or other political subdivision, public corporation, agency or instrumentality of the state, a county or municipality to make payments to such authority for such management on such terms, provisions and conditions as deemed appropriate. Any such contract or contracts may provide for the continuous management of such solid waste from year to year, but for a term not to exceed thirty (30) years. Any costs to any such county, municipality or other political subdivision, public corporation, agency or instrumentality of the state, a county or municipality shall be paid annually out of funds of any such county, municipality or other political subdivision, public corporation, agency or instrumentality of the state or any county or municipality. The entering into of such contract or contracts shall not constitute the incurring of a debt by such county, municipality or other unit of local government, public corporation, agency or instrumentality of the state or any county or municipality within the meaning of any constitutional or statutory limitations on debts of the state, the counties or the municipalities.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1991, ch. 581, § 23, eff from and after passage (approved April 12, 1991).

§ 17-17-347.
Determination by local governments of costs for solid waste management within governmental service areas; establishment of systems for informing users of costs for solid waste management services; use of enterprise funds.

At the conclusion of each fiscal year, beginning with Fiscal Year 1992, each unit of local government shall determine during its regular audit the full and complete cost for solid waste management within the service area of the unit of local government for the previous fiscal year, and shall update the full and complete cost every year thereafter. The Department of Audit shall establish the method for units of local government to use in calculating full and complete cost for the preceding fiscal year to be included as a part of the regular audit of the operations of the unit of local government.

Each unit of local government shall establish a system to inform, no less than once a year, residential and nonresidential users of municipal solid waste management services within its service area of the user’s share, on an average or individual basis, of the full cost for municipal solid waste management as determined pursuant to subsection (1) of this section.

Counties and municipalities are encouraged to operate their municipal solid waste management systems through use of an enterprise fund.

For purposes of this section, “service area” means the area in which the unit of local government provides, directly or by contract, municipal solid waste management services. This section shall not be construed to require a person operating under a franchise agreement to manage municipal solid waste within the service area of a unit of local government to make the calculations or to establish a system to provide information required under this section, unless such person agrees to do so as part of such franchise agreement.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1991, ch. 581, § 24; Laws, 1992, ch. 583 § 8, eff from and after passage (approved May 15, 1992).

§ 17-17-348.
Counties and municipalities to publish detailed report of revenues and costs incurred in operating garbage or rubbish collection or disposal systems.

In addition to any notice requirements otherwise provided by law, the board of supervisors of each county and the governing authorities of each municipality, before the first day of the fiscal year, shall publish in a newspaper having a general circulation in the county, a detailed, itemized report of all revenues, costs and expenses incurred by the county or municipality during the immediately preceding county or municipal fiscal year in operating the garbage or rubbish collection or disposal system. The report shall disclose:

The total dollar amount of revenues received or dedicated by the county or municipality during the immediately preceding fiscal year for operation of the garbage or rubbish collection or disposal system;

The identity of each source of funding and the dollar amount received from each source of funding during the immediately preceding fiscal year for operation of the garbage or rubbish collection or disposal system, including ad valorem taxes, fees and other sources; and

The total dollar amount expended by the county or municipality to operate the garbage or rubbish collection or disposal system, along with the names and addresses of all businesses and persons with whom the county or municipality has contracted to perform or provide garbage or rubbish collection or disposal, the dollar amount of expenditures made under each contract and an itemized list of all other expenditures of county or municipal funds to operate and administer the garbage or rubbish collection or disposal system.

The notice required under subsection (1) of this section shall be no less than one-eighth (1/8) page in size and the type used shall be no smaller than ten (10) point and surrounded by a one-fourth-inch (1/4) solid black border. The notice may not be placed in that portion of the newspaper where legal notices and classified advertisements appear. The notice must appear in a newspaper that is published at least five (5) days a week, unless the only newspaper in the county is published less than five (5) days a week. The newspaper selected must be one of general interest and readership in the community, and not one of limited subject matter. The notice must be published at least once.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1996, ch. 536, § 4, eff from and after passage (approved April 12, 1996).

§ 17-17-349.
Derivation of pecuniary benefit by elected or appointed officials.

No elected or appointed official shall derive any pecuniary benefit, directly or indirectly, as a result of such elected or appointed official’s duties under Sections 17-17-301 through 17-17-349.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1991, ch. 581, § 31, eff from and after passage (approved April 12, 1991).